Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-101.01
Statement of policy.

It is declared to be the policy of the Legislature to (1) regulate the transportation or importation of alcoholic liquor into this state when such alcoholic liquor is intended for delivery or use within the state, (2) promote adequate, economical, and efficient service by licensees selling alcoholic liquor within the State of Nebraska without unjust or undue discrimination, preference, or advantage, (3) generate revenue by imposing an excise tax upon alcoholic liquor, and (4) promote the health, safety, and welfare of the people of the state and encourage temperance in the consumption of alcoholic liquor by sound and careful control and regulation of the manufacture, distribution, and sale of alcoholic liquor.

Laws 1981, LB 124, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 781, § 2;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 3;

Laws 1993, LB 183, § 2;

Laws 1999, LB 267, § 1.